lexc/adj/enhuadjmely.lexc
LEXICON Casemelykorai
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig

Lexicon AddIlyenmely
[stem]+Adj:0 IlyenCasemely;

LEXICON IlyenCasemely
+Acc:^+cAcc^§AA2§t       #;  ! ilyet olyat

LEXICON AddAdjat
0:^+cMid§oeoebbmely§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseat;

Lexicon Tocaseat
[stem]+Adj:0     Possmelyat;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurmely;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fammely;


LEXICON Possmelyat
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Acc:^+cAcc^§AA2§t       #;  ! ilyet olyat
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Fammely;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21fazek§m   Fammely;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Fammely;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21fazek§d   Fammely;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fammely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fammely;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21fazek§t§OEOE25§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fammely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fammely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fammely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fammely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fammely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fammely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammely;




!result
!legeslegkedvesebbet
!legeslegkedvesebben
!legkedvesebbet
!legkedvesebben
!kedvesebbet
!kedvesebben
!kedveset
!kedvesen

LEXICON Adjige
bipoláris AddAdjat;
caolás AddAdjat;
drakulás AddAdjat;
jolánkais AddAdjat;
kvazimodós AddAdjat;
multipoláris AddAdjat;
paulós AddAdjat;
statáriális AddAdjat;
találósdis AddAdjat;
vulgatás AddAdjat;
LEXICON Adj
abellás AddAdjat;
abádis AddAdjat;
adverbiális AddAdjat;
aiszkhüloszos AddAdjat;
aktuális AddAdjat;
algopyrinos AddAdjat;
altais AddAdjat;
amcsis AddAdjat;
andais AddAdjat;
anghis AddAdjat;
antediluviális AddAdjat;
antimikrobiális AddAdjat;
anyucis AddAdjat;
approximális AddAdjat;
aranyparolis AddAdjat;
arztos AddAdjat;
aszexuális AddAdjat;
atyafis AddAdjat;
autógumis AddAdjat;
baburás AddAdjat;
backhauszos AddAdjat;
bajkonuros AddAdjat;
bakis AddAdjat;
bakácsos AddAdjat;
balfás AddAdjat;
balsarátis AddAdjat;
bandatos AddAdjat;
banós AddAdjat;
barinkais AddAdjat;
baronyis AddAdjat;
barthás AddAdjat;
barászos AddAdjat;
batsányis AddAdjat;
bebós AddAdjat;
belosos AddAdjat;
benkáros AddAdjat;
bergmannos AddAdjat;
beronos AddAdjat;
biacsis AddAdjat;
bifokális AddAdjat;
binaurális AddAdjat;
birtás AddAdjat;
bitzós AddAdjat;
blumos AddAdjat;
boczonádis AddAdjat;
bohnos AddAdjat;
boleszlós AddAdjat;
bondoros AddAdjat;
boreális AddAdjat;
borsányis AddAdjat;
botkás AddAdjat;
bozsányis AddAdjat;
brassais AddAdjat;
brokkolis AddAdjat;
brutusos AddAdjat;
budafokos AddAdjat;
bugylis AddAdjat;
burghardtos AddAdjat;
bánházis AddAdjat;
báthorys AddAdjat;
bódés AddAdjat;
caklipaklis AddAdjat;
cavintonos AddAdjat;
centrális AddAdjat;
chaplinos AddAdjat;
chomás AddAdjat;
cirfandlis AddAdjat;
clausos AddAdjat;
connubialis AddAdjat;
corás AddAdjat;
csalás AddAdjat;
csatskós AddAdjat;
csermákos AddAdjat;
csipkerózsikás AddAdjat;
csolschos AddAdjat;
csurjás AddAdjat;
csárdásnés AddAdjat;
cukis AddAdjat;
czagányos AddAdjat;
czibakos AddAdjat;
czoboros AddAdjat;
czynkos AddAdjat;
dacsós AddAdjat;
damós AddAdjat;
darkós AddAdjat;
decimális AddAdjat;
demiános AddAdjat;
dermális AddAdjat;
diasztolés AddAdjat;
dionüszoszos AddAdjat;
disztributív AddAdjat;
dobsás AddAdjat;
donogános AddAdjat;
dossziés AddAdjat;
dromos AddAdjat;
dudlis AddAdjat;
durazzóis AddAdjat;
duális AddAdjat;
délmagyarországos AddAdjat;
döhrmannos AddAdjat;
eganos AddAdjat;
eisenhutos AddAdjat;
elektorális AddAdjat;
embrionális AddAdjat;
episzkopális AddAdjat;
esszenciális AddAdjat;
evvás AddAdjat;
exterritoriális AddAdjat;
fabrós AddAdjat;
faktoriális AddAdjat;
farkassos AddAdjat;
feketekávés AddAdjat;
ferdinándos AddAdjat;
fifilinás AddAdjat;
financiális AddAdjat;
fizikális AddAdjat;
floppis AddAdjat;
folbás AddAdjat;
forgátsos AddAdjat;
fradis AddAdjat;
franyós AddAdjat;
friesenhofos AddAdjat;
fundamentális AddAdjat;
fándlis AddAdjat;
félillegális AddAdjat;
főrabbis AddAdjat;
gaiás AddAdjat;
gallós AddAdjat;
garzós AddAdjat;
gaáros AddAdjat;
genitofemorális AddAdjat;
germanusos AddAdjat;
gironos AddAdjat;
glomeruláris AddAdjat;
goldoványis AddAdjat;
gopcsás AddAdjat;
gotthardis AddAdjat;
graphisoftos AddAdjat;
grexás AddAdjat;
grynaeusos AddAdjat;
guargumis AddAdjat;
guothos AddAdjat;
gutturális AddAdjat;
gyergyais AddAdjat;
gyurcsós AddAdjat;
gárdosos AddAdjat;
góthos AddAdjat;
habzsis AddAdjat;
haimanos AddAdjat;
halvaxos AddAdjat;
handós AddAdjat;
hanzós AddAdjat;
harrachos AddAdjat;
hatalás AddAdjat;
haynaldos AddAdjat;
heckenastos AddAdjat;
hellenbachos AddAdjat;
herzanos AddAdjat;
hieronymis AddAdjat;
hiperlojális AddAdjat;
hodoros AddAdjat;
hollubos AddAdjat;
hommos AddAdjat;
horatiusos AddAdjat;
horváthos AddAdjat;
huhnos AddAdjat;
husis AddAdjat;
háklis AddAdjat;
hénapos AddAdjat;
ibosos AddAdjat;
ikarusos AddAdjat;
illojális AddAdjat;
immateriális AddAdjat;
implomos AddAdjat;
indusztriális AddAdjat;
iniciális AddAdjat;
integratív AddAdjat;
interkontinentális AddAdjat;
interplanetáris AddAdjat;
intragluteális AddAdjat;
intravaszkuláris AddAdjat;
isozos AddAdjat;
izsófos AddAdjat;
jahnos AddAdjat;
jakuzzis AddAdjat;
jedlicskás AddAdjat;
johanos AddAdjat;
jubálos AddAdjat;
juvanczos AddAdjat;
jóborus AddAdjat;
józsefvárosos AddAdjat;
kadocsás AddAdjat;
kajszis AddAdjat;
kamonyais AddAdjat;
kandzsis AddAdjat;
kaplis AddAdjat;
kapócsos AddAdjat;
karczagos AddAdjat;
kasnyás AddAdjat;
katalóniás AddAdjat;
kautzos AddAdjat;
keodos AddAdjat;
kesjáros AddAdjat;
kiliános AddAdjat;
kisjós AddAdjat;
klapkás AddAdjat;
klimkós AddAdjat;
kmoskós AddAdjat;
knuthos AddAdjat;
koczoros AddAdjat;
kohutos AddAdjat;
kolbányis AddAdjat;
kolláros AddAdjat;
kolumbusos AddAdjat;
komjádis AddAdjat;
komplanáris AddAdjat;
konczos AddAdjat;
kongenitális AddAdjat;
konstanciás AddAdjat;
kontinentális AddAdjat;
konzorciális AddAdjat;
korbulyos AddAdjat;
kossalkás AddAdjat;
koszovós AddAdjat;
kováchos AddAdjat;
krajnyákos AddAdjat;
kreutzos AddAdjat;
krocsákos AddAdjat;
krumplis AddAdjat;
krőzusos AddAdjat;
kudászos AddAdjat;
kulis AddAdjat;
kunossos AddAdjat;
kupés AddAdjat;
kurzos AddAdjat;
kuunos AddAdjat;
kádis AddAdjat;
kápés AddAdjat;
kézikocsis AddAdjat;
kótyavetyés AddAdjat;
kőhalmis AddAdjat;
laczós AddAdjat;
lakókocsis AddAdjat;
langos AddAdjat;
latabáros AddAdjat;
lauschmannos AddAdjat;
lehmannos AddAdjat;
lexikális AddAdjat;
liffás AddAdjat;
lischkás AddAdjat;
litsmanos AddAdjat;
lohwagos AddAdjat;
lontais AddAdjat;
ludovikás AddAdjat;
luppás AddAdjat;
lágymányosos AddAdjat;
lóris AddAdjat;
machetés AddAdjat;
macskajancsis AddAdjat;
madácsos AddAdjat;
mailandos AddAdjat;
makis AddAdjat;
mambrinyos AddAdjat;
manndorffos AddAdjat;
maoris AddAdjat;
marczalis AddAdjat;
markupos AddAdjat;
martinusos AddAdjat;
marónis AddAdjat;
masopustos AddAdjat;
mathiászos AddAdjat;
matrikuláris AddAdjat;
mauksos AddAdjat;
maós AddAdjat;
meliusos AddAdjat;
menzurábilis AddAdjat;
michelangelós AddAdjat;
miháltzos AddAdjat;
mikós AddAdjat;
minervás AddAdjat;
miskóltzis AddAdjat;
mobiles AddAdjat;
moldvás AddAdjat;
monoklonális AddAdjat;
monumentális AddAdjat;
mossóczis AddAdjat;
mucis AddAdjat;
muksis AddAdjat;
multimediális AddAdjat;
munteános AddAdjat;
muzeális AddAdjat;
mályuszos AddAdjat;
mártonyos AddAdjat;
mógás AddAdjat;
nacionális AddAdjat;
nagyis AddAdjat;
napóleonos AddAdjat;
nautilusos AddAdjat;
nemessányis AddAdjat;
neonácis AddAdjat;
nibelungos AddAdjat;
nobilis AddAdjat;
nonverbális AddAdjat;
nowotarskis AddAdjat;
nyirós AddAdjat;
nádassos AddAdjat;
nótis AddAdjat;
obálos AddAdjat;
okcidentális AddAdjat;
okályis AddAdjat;
oposos AddAdjat;
orionos AddAdjat;
orális AddAdjat;
osztrovszkis AddAdjat;
ovális AddAdjat;
pacsnis AddAdjat;
pakus AddAdjat;
panasonicos AddAdjat;
paracelsusos AddAdjat;
parfés AddAdjat;
pasteuros AddAdjat;
pauros AddAdjat;
perifériális AddAdjat;
petkós AddAdjat;
pilvaxos AddAdjat;
piváros AddAdjat;
pocis AddAdjat;
polinomiális AddAdjat;
poronyis AddAdjat;
pralinés AddAdjat;
produktív AddAdjat;
provinciális AddAdjat;
puhros AddAdjat;
pythonos AddAdjat;
pógyoros AddAdjat;
radioaktív AddAdjat;
rakssányis AddAdjat;
rauschos AddAdjat;
regálés AddAdjat;
respektábilis AddAdjat;
rippl-rónaias AddAdjat;
rollis AddAdjat;
rozsnyais AddAdjat;
ruzitskás AddAdjat;
rázghás AddAdjat;
salkházis AddAdjat;
sasszés AddAdjat;
schermanos AddAdjat;
schraudos AddAdjat;
sebokos AddAdjat;
sikós AddAdjat;
skaláris AddAdjat;
sozanos AddAdjat;
spielmannos AddAdjat;
stanglis AddAdjat;
stolmáros AddAdjat;
stuhlhoffos AddAdjat;
suppanos AddAdjat;
szalatnais AddAdjat;
szekvenciális AddAdjat;
szenzoriális AddAdjat;
szilágyis AddAdjat;
szkircsákos AddAdjat;
szoldos AddAdjat;
sztehlós AddAdjat;
szunyoghos AddAdjat;
szénásis AddAdjat;
söröskocsis AddAdjat;
tamagoccsis AddAdjat;
tapolczais AddAdjat;
taurinusos AddAdjat;
telmányis AddAdjat;
tevanos AddAdjat;
thotos AddAdjat;
titós AddAdjat;
tomos AddAdjat;
tourinformos AddAdjat;
transzferábilis AddAdjat;
triviális AddAdjat;
tunyogis AddAdjat;
tyrannosaurusos AddAdjat;
uhrlos AddAdjat;
unicelluláris AddAdjat;
uzás AddAdjat;
varjus AddAdjat;
vergiliusos AddAdjat;
vidróczkis AddAdjat;
visualos AddAdjat;
vulnerábilis AddAdjat;
vízibaromfis AddAdjat;
wassos AddAdjat;
wohlos AddAdjat;
zajtis AddAdjat;
zimmermannos AddAdjat;
zsigulis AddAdjat;
zukoros AddAdjat;
ájurvédás AddAdjat;
óbudás AddAdjat;
